South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S57.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 22 Hate Crimes Section 16-3-2410. A person who commits an offense contained in this chapter with the intent to assault, intimidate, or threaten a person because of his race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin, or sexual orientation is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than two thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars, or imprisoned not less than two years nor more than fifteen years, or both. Two thousand dollars of a fine and two years of a sentence imposed pursuant to the provisions of this article may not be suspended. SECTION 2.  Section 16-11-510 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-11-510. (A) It is unlawful for a person to wilfully and maliciously cut, shoot, maim, wound, or otherwise injure or destroy any horse, mule, cattle, hog, sheep, goat, or any other kind, class, article, or description of personal property, or the goods and chattels of another. (B) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a: (1) felony and, upon conviction, must be fined in the discretion of the court or imprisoned not more than ten years, or both, if the injury to the property or the property loss is worth ten thousand dollars or more; (2) felony and, upon conviction, must be fined in the discretion of the court or imprisoned not more than five years, or both, if the injury to the property or the property loss is worth more than two thousand dollars but less than ten thousand dollars; (3) misdemeanor triable in magistrates court or municipal court, notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 22-3-540, 22-3-545, 22-3-550, and 14-25-65, if the injury to the property or the property loss is worth two thousand dollars or less. Upon conviction, the person must be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or imprisoned, not more than thirty days, or both. (C) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (A) with the intent to assault, intimidate, or threaten a person because of his race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin, or sexual orientation is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than two thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars, or imprisoned not less than two years nor more than fifteen years, or both. Two thousand dollars of a fine and two years of a sentence imposed pursuant to the provisions of this subsection may not be suspended. For purposes of this section, "sexual orientation" means a person's actual or perceived heterosexuality, bisexuality, homosexuality, or gender identity or expression. SECTION 3.  Section 16-11-520 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-11-520. (A) It is unlawful for a person to wilfully and maliciously cut, mutilate, deface, or otherwise injure a tree, house, outside fence, or fixture of another or commit any other trespass upon real property of another. (B) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a: (1) felony and, upon conviction, must be fined in the discretion of the court or imprisoned not more than ten years, or both, if the injury to the property or the property loss is worth ten thousand dollars or more; (2) felony and, upon conviction, must be fined in the discretion of the court or imprisoned not more than five years, or both, if the injury to the property or the property loss is worth more than two thousand dollars but less than ten thousand dollars; (3) misdemeanor triable in magistrates court or municipal court, notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 22-3-540, 22-3-545, 22-3-550, and 14-25-65, if the injury to the property or the property loss is worth two thousand dollars or less. Upon conviction, the person must be fined not more than one thousand dollars, or imprisoned not more than thirty days, or both. (C) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (A) with the intent to assault, intimidate, or threaten a person because of his race, religion, color, sex, age, national origin, or sexual orientation is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than two thousand dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars, or imprisoned not less than two years nor more than fifteen years, or both. Two thousand dollars of a fine and two years of a sentence imposed pursuant to the provisions of this subsection may not be suspended. For purposes of this section, "sexual orientation" means a person's actual or perceived heterosexuality, bisexuality, homosexuality, or gender identity or expression. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----